Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2620
Nebraska Optometry
Education Assistance Contract Program; purpose.

There
is hereby established the Nebraska Optometry Education Assistance Contract
Program for the purpose of providing opportunities for citizens of this state
desiring to pursue study in the field of optometry at accredited schools and
colleges outside the state. Eligibility
for the program shall be limited as provided in sections 38-2622 and 38-2623.

Laws 1974, LB 911, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,136.05;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 893;

Laws 2011, LB334, § 3.